it: Stile delle redini: Da morso; Di ritorno; Intrecciato; Ad anello/continuo; Mecate; Romal; Impugnatura in gomma; Laterale; Separate; In tessuto; Altro
nb: Tøylestil: Kandar; Glidetøyle; Flettet; Løkke/sammenhengende; Mecate; Romal; Gummigrep; Sidetøyle; Delt; Gjord; Annet
cs: Rein styl: Pákové otěže; Průvlečky; Proplétané otěže; Spojené/průběžné otěže; Otěže mecate; Otěže romal; Pogumované otěže; Vyvazovací otěže; Dělené otěže; Popruhové otěže; Jiné
vi: Kiểu dây cương: Curb; Draw; Đan dây; Vòng/liên tục; Mecate; Romal; Bọc cao su; Bên; Rời; Vải dệt; Khác
es: Estilo de rienda: Bocado; Alemanas; Entrelazadas; Bucle/continua; Mecate; Romales; Agarre de goma; Laterales; Divididas; Cinta de nailon; Otro
da: Tøjlestil: Kandar; Glidetøjle; Flettet; Løkke/lukket; Mecate; Romal; Gummigreb; Side; Delt; Gjord; Andet
zh-TW: 韁繩樣式: 大勒韁; 滑韁; 編織; 環形/連續; Mecate (馬鬃韁繩); Romal; 橡膠握把; 側韁; 分開式; 織帶; 其他
hu: Kantárszár stílusa: Feszítő; Kikötőszár; Fűzött; Hurkos / zárt szár; Mecate; Romal; Gumírozott markolatú; Oldalsó; Osztott; Heveder; Egyéb
sl-SI: Stil vajeti: Vajeti za Pelham/Curb; Pomožne vajeti (Draw); Prepletene; Zaprte/sklenjene; Mecate; Romal; Gumiran oprijem; Stranske; Odprte (Split); Z gurtno; Drugo
el: Στυλ ηνίων: Curb; Συρόμενα; Πλεγμένα; Θηλιά/συνεχόμενα; Mecate; Romal; Λαβή από καουτσούκ; Πλευρικά; Χωριστά; Ιμάντας; Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl oprát: Pákové zubadlo; Prievlečky; Prepletané; Uzavreté/priebežné; Mecate; Romal; Pogumované; Bočné; Delené; Popruhové; Iné
tr: Dizgin stili: Kantar; Yardımcı; Örgülü; Halka/tek parça; Mecate; Romal; Kauçuk kavrama; Yan; Ayrık; Dokuma; Diğer
lt-LT: Vadelių stilius: Laužtukiniai; Slankiojantys; Pinti; Kilpiniai / vientisi; Mecate; Romal; Guminė rankena; Šoniniai; Perskirti; Juostiniai; Kita
hr-HR: Rein stil: Curb uzde; Klizne uzde (draw); Pletene; Zatvorene uzde (loop); Mecate; Romal; Gumeni hvat; Bočne; Odvojene; Platnene; Ostalo
zh-CN: 马缰绳样式: 勒缰; 滑缰; 编织; 环形/连续; 麦卡特缰绳; 罗梅尔缰绳; 橡胶握把; 侧缰; 分离式; 织带; 其他
pl: Styl wodzy: Munsztukowe; Czarna wodza; Przeplatane; Zamknięte/ciągłe; Mecate; Romal; Z gumowym uchwytem; Wypinacze; Dzielone; Parciane; Inne
nl: Teugel stijl: Curb; Draw; Gevlochten; Lus/doorlopend; Mecate; Romal; Rubberen grip; Side; Gespleten; Web; Overig
sv: Tygelstil: Kandar; Gramantygel; Flätad; Hel/sammanhängande; Mecate; Romal; Gummigrepp; Sidotygel; Delad; Vävribb; Annat
fi: Ohjaksen tyyli: Kankiohjat; Apuohjat; Punosohjat; Lenkkiohjat/yhtenäiset ohjat; Mecate; Romal; Kumigrippi; Sivuohjat; Jaetut ohjat; Kangasohjat; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul hățului: Curb; Culisant; Împletit; Buclă/continuu; Mecate; Romal; Prindere din cauciuc; Lateral; Separați; Textil (chingă); Altele
pt-BR: Rédea estilo: Freio; Alemã; Trançada; Fechada/contínua; Mecate; Romal; Revestimento de borracha; Lateral; Dividida; Fita; Outro
th: รูปแบบสายบังเหียน: แบบเคิร์บ; แบบดรอว์; แบบถัก; แบบวนลูป/ต่อเนื่อง; Mecate; Romal; ด้ามจับยาง; ด้านข้าง; แบบแยก; แบบเว็บ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de rédea: Freio; Alemã; Entrelaçada; Argola/contínua; Mecate; Romal; Pega de borracha; Lateral; Dividida; Lona; Outro
de: Zügelstil: Kandare; Schlaufzügel; Geflochten; Geschlossen/Durchgehend; Mecate; Romal; Gummigriff; Ausbinder; Geteilt; Gurt; Sonstiges
fr: Type de rênes: Bride; Allemande; À lacet; Boucle/continue; Mecate; Romal; Poignée en caoutchouc; Fixe; Séparé; Sangle; Autre
bg-BG: Стил на поводите: Мундщук; Помощни (шпрунт); Плетени; Затворени/непрекъснати; Мекате; Ромал; С гумено покритие; Странични; Разделени; Текстилни; Други
ko: 고삐 방식: 커브; 드로; 레이스; 루프/연속; 메카테; 로말; 고무 그립; 사이드; 스플릿; 웹; 기타
ru: Стиль поводьев: Мундштучный; Скользящий; Плетеный; Цельный повод; Мекате; Ромал; Прорезиненный; Боковой; Раздельный; Тесьмяный; Другое
ja: 手綱スタイル: カーブ; ドロー; レース; ループ/コンティニュアス; メカテ; ロメル; ラバーグリップ; サイド; スプリット; ウェブ; その他
en: Rein style: Curb; Draw; Laced; Loop/continuous; Mecate; Romal; Rubber grip; Side; Split; Web; Other